Hawaii, session 2025, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 101, Session Laws of Hawaii 1992, established the office of international relations to play a critical and needed role in fostering, coordinating, and creating international programs and policies that will affect the State's future development.  The office was seen of as a success in implementing policies and fostering relationships within the Pacific region but was eventually sunset on June 30, 1995. The legislature further finds that The Matsunaga Institute at the university of Hawaii college of social sciences is dedicated to honoring the memory of United States Senator Spark M. Matsunaga and implementing his hope that "every student enrolled in Hawaii's public university system will be exposed to peace studies."  The Institute promotes cross-cultural communication and peacemaking leadership and is committed to building on Hawaii's cultural heritage and island values of aloha, mutual aid and respect, a sense of community, and caring for the land. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish the Matsunaga aloha pacific academy within the office of international relations to facilitate international affairs meetings regarding the Pacific region; and (2)  Rename the office of international affairs to the office of international relations and expand its functions and duties. SECTION 2.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Matsunaga aloha pacific academy.  (a) There is established the Matsunaga aloha pacific academy within the office of international relations under section 201-17 for administrative purposes. (b)  The academy shall: (1)  Collaborate with the Matsunaga Institute of the university of Hawaii college of social sciences; (2)  Raise funds for operating and administrative expenses from private sources, government and non governmental entities, nonprofit foundations, and other organizations; (3)  Establish a main facility on the island of Kauai, in honor of the home of former United States Senator Spark Matsunaga; and (4)  Facilitate international affairs meetings regarding the Pacific region." SECTION 3.  Section 201-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§201‑17[]] Office of international [affairs;] relations; established.  (a) There is established, within the department of business, economic development, and tourism, an office of international [affairs.] relations.  The head of the office shall be known as the director of international relations.  The director shall have experience in international affairs, business, law, or other related fields.  The director shall be appointed by the governor without regard to chapters 76 and 89, and shall be paid at a salary level that shall not exceed      per cent of the salary of the director of business, economic development, and tourism.  The director, may retain staff as necessary without regard to chapters 76 and 89. (b) The office shall[:] serve as the principal resource for the overall analysis, formulation, and coordination of state policies and strategies relating to international matters. The office shall: (1)  Develop policies and strategies that promote and strengthen relations with other countries in the areas of international business, economy, culture, and the arts; (2)  Develop policies that promote transportation between, and tourism with, other countries; (3)  Develop and promote international telecommunications and high technology exchanges; (4)  Encourage the development of international sister-city programs, pairing Hawaii cities with cities around the globe for artistic, cultural, economic, educational, and faith-based exchanges; (5)  Develop and promote Hawaii as the economic, trade, commerce, transportation, banking, and tourism hub of the Pacific; (6)  Develop an international affairs and peace education curriculum that includes studies of international affairs and peace initiatives and takes a proactive, strategic approach to the development of policies that promote the prevention of national and international conflict, nonviolent intervention, mediation, peaceful resolution of conflict, and structured mediation of conflict; [and] (7)  Provide for exchanges of individuals between Hawaii and other nations to develop international and peace-based initiatives[.]; (8)  Formulate and articulate comprehensive statewide goals, objectives, policies, and priorities with respect to matters of an international nature; (9)  Identify and analyze significant issues, problems, and opportunities in the international arena that may confront the State and its citizens; (10)  Serve as the governor's representative and State's liaison with county, state, and federal agencies, as well as foreign governments and their local consulates, with respect to international matters; and (11)  Provide direction and coordination of the international programs, projects, and activities of the various state departments and agencies. (c)  The office shall develop a comprehensive state strategic plan for international activities.  The plan shall include the establishment of immediate and long-range goals for programs and services relating to international activities in the State and the assignment of goals to appropriate state agencies.  The office shall submit the state strategic plan to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (d)  It shall be the duty and responsibility of every state agency with operating programs and services relating to international activities to coordinate with the office in actively working toward the goals and objectives articulated in the state strategic plan.  The executive heads of all appropriate departments and agencies shall cooperate with the office in providing information as the office deems necessary for the effective discharge of its duties.  Nothing in this section shall be deemed to delegate or detract in any way from the functions, powers, and duties prescribed by law for any other department or agency of the State. [(c)] (e)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if any of the responsibilities or duties of the office of international affairs under this section overlap with the responsibilities or duties of another agency or authority under this chapter, the office of international affairs shall have exclusive jurisdiction and authority over those responsibilities and duties." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of international relations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________